Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. The amounts  authorized, as provided by ORS 286A.035, for issuance of gen-
eral obligation bonds of the state  during the 2019-2021 biennium, notwithstanding section 9,
chapter 570, Oregon Laws 2017, are as follows:
GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS
General Fund Obligations
(1) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-G):
(a) Blue Mountain Community
College, Facility for
Agricultural Resource
Management.......................... $ 6,615,000
(b) Central Oregon Community
College, Classroom Building
Redmond Campus.................. $ 8,125,000
(c) Clatsop Community College,
Maritime Science Building .... $ 8,120,000
(d) Klamath Community College,
Apprenticeship and Industrial
Trades Center ....................... $ 3,965,000
(e) Lane Community College,
Health Care Village Facility .. $ 8,125,000
(f) Mt. Hood Community College,
Maywood Park Center........... $ 8,125,000
(g) Oregon Coast Community
College, Workforce Education
and Resiliency Center ........... $ 8,125,000
(h) Portland Community College,
Health Technology Building
Renovation............................ $ 8,125,000
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 1
(i) Southwestern Oregon
Community College,
Sumner and Coaledo Halls
Remodel ................................ $ 2,800,000
(j) Treasure Valley Community
College, Nursing-Allied
Health Professions Center .... $ 5,015,000
(k) Umpqua Community College,
Industrial Technology
Building................................. $ 8,125,000
(2) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-M) ....... $ 101,240,000
(3) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-N) ........ $ 20,270,000
(4) Department of Education
(Art. XI-P) ............................ $ 126,090,000
(5) Oregon Department of
Administrative
Services (Art. XI-Q):
(a) State Fair Horse Barn .......... $ 3,050,000
(b) State Fair Poultry Barn ....... $ 2,045,000
(c) State Fair Facilities
Capital Improvement ............ $ 5,430,000
(d) Department of Corrections:
(A) Capital Improvement and
Renewal................................. $ 24,810,000
(B) Radio System ........................ $ 14,235,000
(C) Camera System ..................... $ 8,790,000
(e) Department of Human
Services, ONE Integrated
Eligibility and Medicaid
Eligibility System .................. $ 38,165,000
(f) Housing and Community
Services Department:
(A) Local Innovation and Fast
Track Housing Program ....... $ 151,550,000
(B) Permanent Supportive
Housing................................. $ 50,730,000
(g) Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
(A) Public Universities Capital
Improvement and Renewal ... $ 65,715,000
(B) Oregon Institute of
Technology, OMIC R&D Rapid
Toolmaking Center, Rapid
Prototyping Education Lab
and Sinter HIP Equipment ... $ 12,905,000
(h) Oregon Military Department:
(A) Salem and Pendleton
Aviation Facility Emergency
Enhancement ........................ $ 9,985,000
(B) Portland Jackson Armory
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 2
Service Life Extension .......... $ 4,335,000
(C) Salem Owen Summers and
Anderson Readiness Center
Service Life Extension .......... $ 5,910,000
(D) Oregon Military Museum ...... $ 2,045,000
(i) Oregon Youth Authority:
(A) Oak Creek Medical and
Dental Renovations ............... $ 1,345,000
(B) Tillamook Medical and
Dental Renovations ............... $ 1,595,000
(C) MacLaren Infirmary and
Pharmacy Renovation and
Expansion.............................. $ 1,875,000
(D) MacLaren West Cottages
Renovation............................ $ 14,325,000
(E) Rogue Valley Facility
Improvements ....................... $ 8,135,000
(F) Control Room Renovations ... $ 1,850,000
(G) Capital Improvements........... $ 5,305,000
(j) State Forestry Department,
Toledo Facility Replacement . $ 1,249,223
(k) Department of
Environmental Quality,
Environmental Data
Management System ............. $ 5,065,000
(L) Legislative Administration
Committee, Document
Publishing and
Management System ............. $ 9,280,000
(m) Judicial Department:
(A) Clackamas County
Courthouse............................ $ 31,935,000
(B) Lane County Courthouse ...... $ 88,455,000
(C) Linn County Courthouse ....... $ 16,180,000
(D) Multnomah County
Courthouse............................ $ 8,625,000
(E) Supreme Court
Building Renovation.............. $ 28,230,000
Dedicated Fund Obligations
(6) Department of Veterans’
Affairs (Art. XI-A) ................ $ 180,000,000
(7) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ............... $ 10,000,000
(8) Housing and Community
Services Department
(Art. XI-I(2)) ......................... $ 50,000,000
(9) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services
(Art. XI-Q):
(a) Revenue Building Electrical
System Upgrades .................. $ 10,240,000
(b) Justice Building
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 3
Exterior Renovations............ $ 5,105,000
(c) Portland State Office
Building Improvements......... $ 8,725,000
(d) Wilsonville Building
Purchase ............................... $ 24,330,000
(e) State Forestry Department,
Toledo Facility Replacement . $ 1,735,777
Total General Obligation
Bonds ....................................  $ 1,236,150,000
SECTION 2. The amounts authorized, as provided  by ORS 286A.035, for issuance of re-
venue bonds of the state during the 2019-2021 biennium are as follows:
REVENUE BONDS
Direct Revenue Bonds
Housing and Community
Services Department ............. $ 500,000,000
Department of
Transportation...................... $ 485,000,000
Oregon Business Development
Department ........................... $ 100,000,000 
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services,
Lottery Revenue Bonds ........ $ 302,505,000
Total Direct Revenue
Bonds ....................................  $ 1,387,505,000
Pass-Through Revenue Bonds
Oregon Business Development
Department, Industrial
Development Bonds............... $ 600,000,000
Oregon Business Development
Department, Beginning and
Expanding Farmer Loan
Program ................................ $ 5,000,000
Oregon Facilities Authority .. $ 1,000,000,000
Housing and Community
Services Department ............. $ 600,000,000
Total Pass-Through Revenue
Bonds ....................................  $ 2,205,000,000
Total Revenue Bonds ............ $ 3,592,505,000
SECTION 3. The amount authorized, as provided by ORS  286A.035, for issuance of cer-
tificates of participation and other financing agreements  of the state during the 2019-2021
biennium for the Oregon Department of Administrative Services is $80,000,000.
SECTION 4. The amounts allocated for private activity bonds, as provided in ORS
286A.615, are as follows:
(1) For calendar year 2020,
the amount of $440,024,865
is allocated as follows:
(a) Oregon Business Development
Department, Industrial
Development Bonds............... $ 40,000,000
(b) Oregon Business Development
Department, Beginning and
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 4
Expanding Farmer Loan
Program ................................ $ 2,500,000
(c) Housing and Community
Services Department ............. $ 250,000,000
(d) Private Activity Bond
Committee............................. $ 147,524,865
(2) For calendar year 2021,
the amount of $440,024,865
is allocated as follows:
(a) Oregon Business Development
Department, Industrial
Development Bonds............... $ 40,000,000
(b) Oregon Business Development
Department, Beginning and
Expanding Farmer Loan
Program ................................ $ 2,500,000
(c) Housing and Community
Services Department ............. $ 250,000,000
(d) Private Activity Bond
Committee............................. $ 147,524,865
(3) If an increase in this state’s population, a
sufficient increase in the Consumer Price
Index or a change in federal law allows the
private activity bond limit as set by the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, to
exceed $440,024,865 during the 2020 calendar
year or $440,024,865 during the 2021 calendar
year, the increase is allocated to the Private
Activity Bond Committee.
SECTION 5.
For purposes of Article XI-G, section 1, of the  Oregon Constitution, the
Legislative Assembly determines that the projects authorized to be  financed pursuant to
section 1 (1)  of this 2019 Act with bonds issued under Article XI-G of the Oregon Constitution
will benefit  higher education institutions or activities or community colleges authorized by
law to receive state aid.
SECTION 6. Bonds authorized under section 1 (1) of this  2019 Act may not be issued until
the constructing  authority certifies that the constructing authority has matching funds
available for  the same or similar purposes as the Article XI-G bonds that will fund the grant
to the constructing  authority, that the match funds are not proceeds of indebtedness in-
curred by the state under any other article of  the Oregon Constitution, and that the match
funds are available to the constructing authority in an amount at least equal to  the amount
of indebtedness incurred by the state through the issuance of the Article XI-G bonds.
SECTION 7. Of the proceeds from the lottery revenue bonds authorized under section  2
of this 2019  Act, $6,500,000 may be used to provide the required matching funds in relation
to the Article XI-G bonds authorized under section 1 (1)(a) of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 8. (1) Out of the amount specified in section 1  (5)(m)(A) of this 2019 Act, the
State Treasurer may issue Article XI-Q bonds in an amount not to exceed $31,500,000  of net
proceeds for the purposes and in the manner  specified in section 8, chapter 705, Oregon Laws
2013, plus an amount estimated by the State Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related costs.
(2) Out of the amount specified  in section 1 (5)(m)(B) of this 2019 Act, the State Treas-
urer may issue Article XI-Q bonds in an amount not to  exceed $87,600,000 of net proceeds for
the purposes and in the manner specified in section  8, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, plus
an amount estimated by the State Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related costs.
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 5
(3) Out of the amount specified in section  1 (5)(m)(C) of this 2019 Act, the State Treas-
urer may issue Article XI-Q bonds in an amount not to  exceed $15,900,000 of net proceeds for
the purposes and in the manner specified in section  8, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, plus
an amount estimated by the State Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related costs.
(4) For  purposes of sections 8 and 9, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, and section 64,
chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013, bonds issued pursuant to this section  are considered to be
bonds issued pursuant to section 8, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013.
(5) Bonds may  not be issued pursuant to section 1 (5)(m)(A), (B) or (C) of this 2019 Act
except as provided in this section.
SECTION 9.  Section 1,  chapter 570, Oregon Laws 2017, as amended by section 1, chapter 87,
Oregon Laws 2018, and section 7, chapter  30, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5542), is
amended to read:
Sec. 1.  The amounts authorized,  as provided by ORS 286A.035, for issuance of general obligation
bonds of the state during the 2017-2019 biennium, notwithstanding  section 10, chapter 705, Oregon
Laws 2013, are as follows:
GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS
General Fund Obligations
(1) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-G):
(a) Oregon Institute of
Technology, Center for
Excellence in Engineering
and Technology/Cornett
Hall Renovation ............................ $ 2,050,000
(b) Oregon State University:
(A) Dairy Products Pilot Plant ........ $ 3,055,000
(B) Gilkey Hall Renovation .............. $ 2,050,000
(C) Cascades Academic
Building 2 .......................................$ 10,215,000
(c) Portland State University,
Graduate School of
Education Facility ....................... $ 36,485,000
(d) University of Oregon,
Campus for Accelerating
Scientific Impact .......................... $ 70,910,000
(e) Western Oregon University:
(A) Information Technology
Center Renovation ....................... $ 540,000
(B) Oregon Military Building
Renovation ..................................... $ 540,000
(f) Blue Mountain Community
College, Facility for
Agricultural Resource
Management .................................. $ 5,115,000
(g) Chemeketa Community
College, Agricultural
Complex ..........................................$ 6,125,000
(h) Clackamas Community College:
(A) DeJardin Building Addition ....... $ 8,140,000
(B) Student Services and
Community Commons .................. $ 8,140,000
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 6
(i) Clatsop Community College,
Maritime Science Building ........ $ 8,135,000
(j) Columbia Gorge Community
College, Middle College
Prototype Facility ........................ $ 7,400,000
(k) Lane Community College,
Health Care Village Facility ..... $ 8,140,000
(L) Linn-Benton Community
College, [ Student Advising ]
[and Campus Safety Center ]
Career Technical Education,
Student Advising and Campus
Safety Renovations ................... $ 7,635,000
(m) Mt. Hood Community College,
Maywood Park Center ................ $ 8,140,000
(n) Oregon Coast Community
College, Workforce Education
and Resiliency Center ................. $ 8,140,000
(o) Portland Community College,
Health Technology
Building Renovation .................... $ 8,140,000
(p) Rogue Community College,
Redwood Campus Science
Facility ...........................................$ 6,125,000
(q) Southwestern Oregon
Community College,
Dellwood Hall Remodel and
Expansion .......................................$ 2,805,000
(r) Treasure Valley Community
College, Workforce
Vocational Center ........................ $ 2,865,000
(s) Umpqua Community College,
Industrial Technology
Building ..........................................$ 8,140,000
(2) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ....................... $ 10,300,000
(3) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-M) .............. $ 101,180,000
(4) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-N) ............... $ 20,430,000
(5) Department of Education
(Art. XI-P) ......................................$ 100,985,000
(6) Oregon Department of
Administrative
Services (Art. XI-Q):
(a) Department of Corrections:
(A) Capital Improvements and
Renewal ..........................................$ 26,770,000
(B) Technology Infrastructure ......... $ 12,445,000
(b) Department of Education,
Oregon School for the Deaf
Facility Improvements ................ $ 4,365,000
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 7
(c) Department of Environmental
Quality, Environmental Data
Management System .................... $ 5,070,000
(d) Department of Human
Services, ONE Integrated
Eligibility and Medicaid
Eligibility System ......................... $ 34,045,000
(e) Department of Justice,
Child Support Enforcement
Automated System ....................... $ 19,400,000
(f) Department of Revenue,
Core Tax Revenue Systems
Replacement .................................. $ 4,855,000
(g) Department of Veterans’
Affairs:
(A) Lebanon Veteran’s Home
Parking Lot ................................... $ 1,345,000
(B) The Dalles Veterans’ Home
Capital Improvements ................. $ 1,195,000
(C) Roseburg Veterans’ Home .......... $ 10,720,000
(h) Housing and Community
Services Department, Local
Innovation and Fast Track
Housing Program ......................... $ 81,090,000
(i) Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
(A) Public Universities Capital
Improvement and Renewal ......... $ 50,620,000
(B) Eastern Oregon University,
Loso Hall Renovation ................. $ 5,575,000
(C) Oregon Institute of
Technology:
(i) Center for Excellence in
Engineering and Technology/
Cornett Hall Renovation ............ $ 38,475,000
(ii) Oregon Manufacturing
Innovation Center, Research
and Development Facility .......... $ 3,940,000
(D) Oregon State University:
(i) Cordley Hall Renovation ............ $ 15,250,000
(ii) Fairbanks Hall Renovation ........ $ 11,220,000
(iii) Gilkey Hall Renovation .............. $ 1,045,000
(iv) Cascades Expansion Site
Reclamation ................................... $ 9,145,000
(v) Cascades Academic
Building 2 .......................................$ 29,410,000
(E) Portland State University,
Graduate School of
Education Facility ....................... $ 9,145,000
(F) Southern Oregon
University:
(i) Central Hall Capital
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 8
Improvements ................................ $ 6,125,000
(ii) Boiler Replacement ...................... $ 2,855,000
(G) Western Oregon University:
(i) Information Technology
Center Renovation ....................... $ 5,070,000
(ii) Oregon Military Building
Renovation ..................................... $ 7,335,000
(j) Legislative Administration
Committee, Capitol
Accessibility, Maintenance,
and Safety ......................................$ 23,660,000
(k) Oregon Judicial Department:
(A) Lane County Courthouse ........... $ 5,115,000
(B) Multnomah County
Courthouse ..................................... $ 102,495,000
(C) Oregon Supreme Court
Building Renovation .................... $ 6,125,000
(L) Oregon Military Department:
(A) Grants Pass Armory
Service Life Extension ................ $ 3,330,000
(B) Regional Armory Emergency
Enhancement Project .................. $ 8,675,000
(C) Regional Training Institute ....... $ 6,630,000
(D) Resiliency Grant Fund ................ $ 5,070,000
(E) Youth Challenge Armory ........... $ 5,095,000
(m) Oregon Youth Authority:
(A) Capital Improvements ................. $ 17,450,000
(B) MacLaren West Cottages
Renovation ..................................... $ 15,450,000
(C) Rogue Valley Facility
Improvements ................................ $ 7,095,000
(n) State Department of Fish
and Wildlife ................................... $ 10,215,000
(o) State Forestry Department,
Toledo Facility Replacement ..... $ 774,225
Dedicated Fund Obligations
(7) Department of Veterans’
Affairs (Art. XI-A) ........................ $ 120,000,000
(8) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-F(1)):
(a) Portland State University:
(A) Land Acquisition for
University Center Building ........ $ 15,260,000
(B) 12th & Market
Residence Hall .............................. $ 54,225,000
(C) Graduate School of
Education Facility ....................... $ 6,080,000
(D) Corbett Building Purchase ......... $ 5,100,000
(b) Oregon Institute of
Technology, Student
Recreation Center ........................ $ 5,115,000
(c) Eastern Oregon University,
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 9
Track and Field Facilities
Restoration .................................... $ 1,180,000
(d) Western Oregon University,
Natural Sciences Building
Renovation ..................................... $ 3,560,000
(9) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ....................... $ 10,000,000
(10) Housing and Community
Services Department
(Art. XI-I(2)) ................................... $ 25,000,000
(11) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services
(Art. XI-Q):
(a) Portland State Office
Building Improvements ............... $ 13,360,000
(b) State Forestry Department,
Toledo Facility Replacement ..... $ 1,075,775
Total General Obligation
Bonds ..............................................$ 1,335,570,000
SECTION 10. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 26, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 30, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 10